Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.35, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application. All ballots for every election shall be prepared in accordance with sections 204B.35 to 204B.44 and deleted text begin chapterdeleted text end new text begin chaptersnew text end 204Dnew text begin and 204Enew text end , except for voting machine ballots or as otherwise provided by law. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204C.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Ranked choice voting election. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, the votes cast in a ranked choice voting election must be counted according to the procedures established in chapter 204E. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Exception; certain nonpartisan candidate. If not more than twice the number of individuals to be elected to a nonpartisan office file for the nomination, their names and the name of the office shall be omitted from the state and county nonpartisan primary ballot and the candidates who filed shall be the nominees.new text begin For candidates in a nonpartisan ranked choice voting election, candidates shall be omitted from the state and county primary ballot.new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [204E.01] APPLICABILITY; AUTHORIZED LOCAL ADOPTION ONLY. new text end new text begin This chapter applies to all elections conducted using ranked choice voting as authorized by section 204E.03. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, Minnesota election law applies to elections conducted using ranked choice voting. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [204E.02] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Active candidate. new text end new text begin "Active candidate" means any candidate who has not been defeated or elected and is not a withdrawn candidate. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Batch elimination. new text end new text begin "Batch elimination" means a simultaneous defeat of multiple continuing candidates who are mathematically impossible to be elected. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Cast vote record. new text end new text begin "Cast vote record" means the tabulatable record of all aggregated votes produced by a single voter in one voting session. For ballots on which voters have indicated a write-in choice, the finalized cast vote record indicates whether the write-in choice was cast for one of the declared write-in candidates, and if so, which one. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Hand count election. new text end new text begin "Hand count election" means an election in which all tabulation of ballots is done by hand, regardless of whether the ballots are cast in a polling place or as absentee or mail ballots. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Highest continuing ranking. new text end new text begin "Highest continuing ranking" means the ranking on a voter's ballot with the lowest numerical value for a continuing candidate. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Inactive ballot. new text end new text begin "Inactive ballot" means a ballot that does not count for any candidate in a given round of tabulation as provided in section 204E.06 or 204E.07. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Mathematically impossible to be elected. new text end new text begin "Mathematically impossible to be elected" means: new text end new text begin (1) the candidate cannot be elected because the sum of (i) the candidate's current vote total and (ii) the current vote totals of all other candidates in the current round with fewer votes or an equal number of votes would not be enough to surpass the candidate with the next higher current vote total; or new text end new text begin (2) the candidate has a lower current vote total than a candidate who is described by clause (1). new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Maximum possible threshold. new text end new text begin "Maximum possible threshold" means the number of votes sufficient for a candidate to be elected under a first ranked choice tabulation under sections 204E.06 and 204E.07. Maximum possible threshold equals: new text end new text begin (1) the sum of the total ballots cast that include votes, undervotes, skipped rankings, and overvotes for the office; divided by new text end new text begin (2) the sum of one plus the number of offices to be filled; then new text end new text begin (3) adding one to the result; and new text end new text begin (4) disregarding any fractions. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Multiple-seat election. new text end new text begin "Multiple-seat election" means an election in which two or more seats in an office are to be filled from a single set of candidates on the ballot. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Overvote. new text end new text begin "Overvote" means a voter has ranked more than one candidate at the same ranking. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Partially defective ballot. new text end new text begin "Partially defective ballot" means a ballot that is defective to the extent that the election judges are unable to determine the voter's intent with respect to the office being counted. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Ranked choice voting. new text end new text begin "Ranked choice voting" means an election method in which voters rank candidates for an office in order of their preference, with each vote counting for the highest-ranked continuing candidate on each ballot until that candidate has been elected or defeated as provided in this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Ranked choice voting local election official. new text end new text begin "Ranked choice voting local election official" means the county auditor, school district clerk, or municipal clerk responsible for duties related to election administration in the applicable jurisdiction. Where more than one ranked choice voting election jurisdiction is involved, the ranked choice voting local election official is presumed to be the county auditor if the county has adopted ranked choice voting. If an overlapping city and school district adopt ranked choice voting, the municipal clerk is presumed to be the ranked choice voting election official. Nothing in this subdivision prohibits overlapping jurisdictions from agreeing to an alternative ranked choice voting election official. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Ranked choice voting tabulation center. new text end new text begin "Ranked choice voting tabulation center" means the location where ballots are processed automatically or by hand and are tabulated. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Ranking. new text end new text begin "Ranking" means the number assigned by a voter to a candidate to express the voter's preference for that candidate. Ranking number one is the highest ranking. A ranking of lower numerical value indicates a greater preference for a candidate than a ranking of higher numerical value. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Repeat candidate ranking. new text end new text begin "Repeat candidate ranking" means a voter ranks the same candidate at multiple rankings for the office being counted. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Round. new text end new text begin "Round" means an instance of the sequence of voting tabulation steps established in section 204E.06 or 204E.07. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Single-seat election. new text end new text begin "Single-seat election" means an election in which one seat in an office is to be filled from a single set of candidates on the ballot. new text end new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Skipped ranking. new text end new text begin "Skipped ranking" means a voter has left a ranking blank and ranks a candidate at a subsequent ranking. new text end new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Surplus. new text end new text begin "Surplus" means the total number of votes cast for an elected candidate in excess of the threshold. new text end new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Surplus fraction of a vote. new text end new text begin "Surplus fraction of a vote" means the proportion of each vote to be transferred when a surplus is transferred. The surplus fraction is calculated by dividing the surplus by the total votes cast for the elected candidate, calculated to four decimal places, ignoring any remainder. new text end new text begin Subd. 23. new text end new text begin Threshold. new text end new text begin "Threshold" means the number of votes sufficient for a candidate to be elected. In any given single-seat election, the threshold equals: the total votes counted during that tabulation round, excluding inactive ballots; divided by two; then adding one; and disregarding any fractions. In any given multiple-seat election, the threshold equals: the total votes counted in the first round after removing defective ballots; divided by the sum of one plus the number of offices to be filled; adding one to the result; and disregarding any fractions. new text end new text begin Subd. 24. new text end new text begin Totally defective ballot. new text end new text begin "Totally defective ballot" means a ballot that is defective to the extent that election judges are unable to determine the voter's intent for any office on the ballot. new text end new text begin Subd. 25. new text end new text begin Transfer value. new text end new text begin "Transfer value" means the fraction of a vote that a transferred ballot will contribute to the next ranked continuing candidate on that ballot. The transfer value of a vote cast for an elected candidate is calculated by multiplying the surplus fraction of each vote by its current value, calculated to four decimal places, ignoring any remainder. The transfer value of a vote cast for a defeated candidate is the same as its current value. new text end new text begin Subd. 26. new text end new text begin Transferable vote. new text end new text begin "Transferable vote" means a vote or a fraction of a vote for a candidate who has been either elected or defeated. new text end new text begin Subd. 27. new text end new text begin Undeclared candidate. new text end new text begin "Undeclared candidate" means a candidate who does not file a request within the time required by section 204E.05, subdivision 4, for the candidate's write-in votes to be counted and whose name does not otherwise appear on the ballot. new text end new text begin Subd. 28. new text end new text begin Undervote. new text end new text begin "Undervote" means a voter did not rank any candidates for an office. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [204E.03] AUTHORIZATION FOR LOCAL ADOPTION. new text end new text begin (a) After January 1, 2026, or the adoption of administrative rules governing ranked choice voting by the secretary of state, whichever is later, the following political subdivisions may adopt, in the manner provided in this section, ranked choice voting as a method of voting for local offices within the political subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) home rule charter or statutory cities; new text end new text begin (2) school districts; and new text end new text begin (3) counties. new text end new text begin (b) A jurisdiction, whether governed by statute or charter, that adopts ranked choice voting may only do so by a ballot question presented to the voters. The ranked choice voting method may be repealed by the same method used for adoption. new text end new text begin (c) Before adopting the use of ranked choice voting for an election held in conjunction with a statewide election, a jurisdiction must enter into a conditional agreement with the county or counties responsible for administering the jurisdiction's election. new text end new text begin (d) If a home rule charter or statutory city adopts ranked choice voting without an agreement with the county or counties, the election conducted by ranked choice voting must not be held in conjunction with a statewide election and the jurisdiction must administer its own election. new text end new text begin (e) Before a school district can adopt the use of ranked choice voting for an election not held in conjunction with a statewide election, the district must first enter into a conditional agreement with the city or cities within the district's boundaries responsible for administering any elections conducted not in conjunction with a statewide election. new text end new text begin (f) A home rule charter jurisdiction that adopts a ranked choice voting system in its charter may adopt this chapter by reference in an ordinance but is not required to do so. new text end new text begin (g) Ranked choice voting must only be used to elect local offices at a general or special election. new text end new text begin (h) A jurisdiction that adopts the use of ranked choice voting in local elections must do so no later than 20 weeks before the state primary or 90 days before the first day for filing affidavits of candidacy for the office for which ranked choice voting is to be used as the method of election if the election is not held in conjunction with a state primary or state general election. new text end new text begin (i) Repeal of ranked choice voting must be no later than 90 days before the first day for filing affidavits of candidacy for offices for which ranked choice voting is used as the method of election. new text end new text begin (j) The ranked choice voting local election official must notify the secretary of state and, if applicable, the county auditor within four weeks following adoption or repeal of ranked choice voting. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [204E.04] BALLOTS IN LOCAL RANKED CHOICE VOTING ELECTIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Ballot format. new text end new text begin (a) If there are three or more qualified candidates, a ballot must allow a voter to rank three candidates for each office in order of preference and must also allow the voter to add write-in candidates. new text end new text begin (b) A ballot must: new text end new text begin (1) include instructions to voters that clearly indicate how to mark the ballot; new text end new text begin (2) include instructions to voters that clearly indicate how to rank candidates in order of the voter's preference; and new text end new text begin (3) indicate the number of seats to be elected for each office. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Mixed-election method ballots. new text end new text begin If elections are held in which ranked choice voting is used in addition to other methods of voting, the ranked choice voting and nonranked choice voting elections must be on the same ballot card if possible, with ranked choice voting and nonranked choice voting portions clearly separated. A jurisdiction may not deviate from the standard ballot order of federal offices, state offices, or state constitutional amendments, but may deviate from the standard ballot order for other offices to allow separation of ranked choice voting and nonranked choice voting elections. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Ballot format rules. new text end new text begin The secretary of state must adopt rules regarding ranked choice voting ballot format, consistent with this section. Notwithstanding section 204B.36, the rules adopted under this subdivision may provide a standard for ballot format that differs from the standards required by that section. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [204E.05] LOCAL RANKED CHOICE VOTING TABULATION CENTER. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Tabulation of votes; generally. new text end new text begin The ranked choice voting local election official must designate one location to serve as the ranked choice voting tabulation center. If the tabulation includes a manual count of physical ballots, the center must be accessible to the public for the purpose of observing the vote tabulation. Tabulation of votes must be conducted as described in sections 204E.06 and 204E.07. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Precinct tabulation. new text end new text begin In an election where ranked choice voting is used, the county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk shall deliver one set of summary statements, all spoiled ballots, and the envelopes containing the ballots to the ranked choice voting tabulation center as soon as possible after the vote counting is completed and the election judges have returned materials pursuant to section 204C.27. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Notice of recess in count. new text end new text begin At any time following receipt of materials under subdivision 2, the ranked choice voting local election official may declare a recess. Notice of the recess must include the date, time, and location at which the process of recording and tabulating votes will resume and the reason for the recess. Notice must be posted on the local jurisdiction's official bulletin board and on the door of the ranked choice voting tabulation center. During any recess, all electronic voting data and ballots must be secured. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Recording write-in votes. new text end new text begin (a) At a time set by the ranked choice voting local election official, the judges and any other election officials designated by the ranked choice voting local election official shall convene at the ranked choice voting tabulation center to examine ballots on which voters have indicated a write-in choice and record the names and number of votes received by each write-in candidate who submits a request as required by this subdivision. The number of votes received by write-in candidates who did not file a request as provided in this subdivision must be recorded as a group by office. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding section 204B.09, subdivision 3, a candidate for a city or school district office whose election is governed by this chapter and who wants write-in votes for the candidate to be counted must file a written request with the filing officer not more than seven days before the election. The filing officer shall provide copies of the form to make the request. The filing officer shall not accept a written request later than 5:00 p.m. on the last day for filing a written request. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Ranked choice vote tabulation. new text end new text begin After all votes have been recorded, and at a time set by the ranked choice voting local election official, the process of tabulating votes cast for offices to be elected using the ranked choice method must begin. The counting must continue until preliminary results for all races are determined, subject to subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [204E.06] TABULATION OF VOTES; SINGLE-SEAT LOCAL RANKED CHOICE VOTING ELECTIONS. new text end new text begin (a) This section applies to a ranked choice voting election in which one seat in an office is to be filled from a single set of candidates on the ballot. The method of tabulating ranked choice votes for single-seat elections as described in this section must be known as the "single-seat single transferable vote" method of tabulation. new text end new text begin (b) A first ranked choice tabulation shall be done under this paragraph before a tabulation as described in paragraph (c). A first ranked choice tabulation will consist of a first round only. Under the first ranked choice tabulation, the vote total will be the sum of the ranked votes marked number one. The maximum possible threshold must be determined. If the vote total for a candidate, other than an undeclared or a declared write-in candidate, is equal to or greater than the maximum possible threshold, that candidate is declared elected and the tabulation is complete. If the vote total for no candidate, other than an undeclared or a declared write-in candidate, is equal to or greater than the maximum possible threshold, additional rounds must be performed as provided in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (c) Tabulation of votes at the ranked choice voting tabulation center must proceed in rounds for each office to be counted. The threshold must be calculated. The sum of all ranked choice votes for every candidate must be calculated. Each round must proceed sequentially as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the number of votes cast for each candidate, as indicated by the highest continuing ranking on each ballot, must be counted. If a candidate, other than an undeclared write-in candidate, has a vote total that is equal to or greater than the threshold, that candidate is declared elected and the tabulation is complete. If no candidate, other than an undeclared write-in candidate, has a vote total that is equal to or greater than the threshold, a new round begins and the tabulation must continue as described in clause (2); new text end new text begin (2) at the beginning of the second round only, all undeclared candidates must be defeated and all candidates for whom it is mathematically impossible to be elected may be defeated simultaneously. For third and subsequent rounds, the candidate with the fewest votes must be defeated and all candidates for whom it is mathematically impossible to be elected may be defeated simultaneously. Votes for the defeated candidates must be transferred to each ballot's next-ranked continuing candidate, except votes for candidates defeated in the final round are not transferred if, by their defeat, the number of continuing candidates is reduced to one. If no candidate can be defeated under this clause, the tabulation must continue as described in clause (3). Otherwise, the tabulation must continue as described in clause (4); new text end new text begin (3) ties between candidates with the fewest votes must be resolved by lot by the ranked choice voting local election official. The candidate chosen by lot must be defeated. The result of the tie resolution must be recorded and reused in the event of a recount; new text end new text begin (4) the procedures in clauses (1) to (3) must be repeated until one candidate reaches the threshold. When only one continuing candidate remains, that continuing candidate must be elected; and new text end new text begin (5) when a skipped ranking, overvote, or repeat candidate ranking is encountered on a ballot, that ballot shall count toward the highest continuing ranking that is not a skipped ranking, overvote, or repeat candidate ranking. If any ballot cannot be advanced because no further continuing candidates are ranked on that ballot, or because the only votes for further continuing candidates that are ranked on that ballot are either overvotes or repeat candidate rankings, the ballot shall not count toward any candidate in that round or in subsequent rounds for the office being counted. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [204E.07] TABULATION OF VOTES; MULTIPLE-SEAT LOCAL RANKED CHOICE VOTING ELECTIONS. new text end new text begin (a) This section applies to a ranked choice voting election in which two or more seats in office are to be filled from a single set of candidates on the ballot. The method of tabulating ranked choice votes for multiple-seat elections as described in this section must be known as the "multiple-seat single transferable vote" method of tabulation. new text end new text begin (b) A first ranked choice tabulation shall be done under this paragraph before a tabulation as described in paragraph (c). A first ranked choice tabulation will consist of a first round only. Under the first ranked choice tabulation, the vote total will be the sum of the ranked votes marked number one. The maximum possible threshold must be determined. If the number of candidates, other than any undeclared or declared write-in candidate, whose vote total is equal to or greater than the maximum possible threshold is equal to the number of seats to be filled, those candidates are declared elected and the tabulation is complete. If the number of candidates, other than any undeclared or declared write-in candidate, whose vote total is equal to or greater than the maximum possible threshold is less than the number of seats to be filled, additional rounds must be performed as provided in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (c) Tabulation of votes at the ranked choice voting tabulation center must proceed in rounds for each office to be counted. The threshold must be calculated. The sum of all ranked choice votes for every candidate must be calculated. Each round must proceed sequentially as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the number of votes cast for each candidate for the current round must be counted. If the number of candidates, other than any undeclared write-in candidate, whose vote total is equal to or greater than the threshold is equal to the number of seats to be filled, those candidates who are continuing candidates are elected and the tabulation is complete. If the number of candidates, other than any undeclared write-in candidate, whose vote total is equal to or greater than the threshold is not equal to the number of seats to be filled, a new round begins and the tabulation must continue as described in clause (2); new text end new text begin (2) surplus votes for any candidates whose vote total is equal to or greater than the threshold must be calculated; new text end new text begin (3) the candidate with the largest surplus is declared elected and that candidate's surplus is transferred. A tie between two or more candidates must be resolved by lot by the ranked choice voting local election official. The surplus of the candidate chosen by lot must be transferred before other transfers are made. The result of the tie resolution must be recorded and reused in the event of a recount. The transfer value of each vote cast for an elected candidate must be transferred to the next continuing candidate on that ballot. If no candidate has a surplus, the tabulation must continue as described in clause (4). Otherwise, the tabulation must continue as described in clause (1); new text end new text begin (4) if there are no transferable surplus votes, the candidate with the fewest votes is defeated. Votes for a defeated candidate are transferred at their transfer value to each ballot's next-ranked continuing candidate, except votes for candidates defeated in the final round are not transferred if, by their defeat, the number of continuing candidates is reduced to the number of seats yet to be filled. Ties between candidates with the fewest votes must be resolved by lot by the ranked choice voting local election official, and the candidate chosen by lot must be defeated. The result of the tie resolution must be recorded and reused in the event of a recount; new text end new text begin (5) the procedures in clauses (1) to (4) must be repeated until the number of candidates whose vote total is equal to or greater than the threshold is equal to the number of seats to be filled, or until the number of continuing candidates is equal to the number of seats yet to be filled. If the number of continuing candidates is equal to the number of seats yet to be filled, any remaining continuing candidates must be declared elected; and new text end new text begin (6) when a skipped ranking, overvote, or repeat candidate ranking is encountered on a ballot, that ballot shall count toward the highest continuing ranking that is not a skipped ranking, overvote, or repeat candidate ranking. If any ballot cannot be advanced because no further continuing candidates are ranked on that ballot, or because the only votes for further continuing candidates that are ranked on that ballot are either overvotes or repeat candidate rankings, the ballot shall not count toward any candidate in that round or in subsequent rounds for the office being counted. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [204E.08] LOCAL RANKED CHOICE VOTING ELECTIONS; REPORTING RESULTS. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to the requirements of section 204C.24, each precinct must print an additional precinct summary statement, which must include the number of first choices cast for each candidate in that precinct. new text end new text begin (b) The ranked choice voting local election official must provide a tabulation summary statement of each contest with the following information: new text end new text begin (1) total votes cast; new text end new text begin (2) number of undervotes; new text end new text begin (3) number of totally defective and spoiled ballots; new text end new text begin (4) threshold calculation; new text end new text begin (5) total first choice rankings for all candidates; new text end new text begin (6) round-by-round tabulation results, including simultaneous batch eliminations, surplus transfers if applicable, and defeated candidate transfers; and new text end new text begin (7) inactive ballots at each round. new text end new text begin (c) In jurisdictions where ballots are scanned and recorded electronically, the ranked choice voting local election official must provide an electronically available spreadsheet of the cast vote record, consistent with the requirements of section 206.845. new text end new text begin (d) The jurisdiction must canvass the election returns pursuant to applicable state statutes for the election being held, and the canvassing board report must include the information required in the ranked choice voting tabulation center summary statement, with the addition of the number of persons registered to vote before election day by precinct, the number of persons registered on election day by precinct, and the number of accepted regular, military, and overseas absentee ballots and mail ballots. If the election is held in conjunction with a state general election, the canvass report must also include the number of federal office only absentee ballots and, if applicable, the number of presidential absentee ballots. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [204E.09] LOCAL RANKED CHOICE ELECTION RECOUNTS. new text end new text begin (a) A candidate defeated in the final round of tabulation may request a recount as provided in section 204C.361, to the extent applicable. For the purpose of ranked choice voting recounts, the ranked choice voting local election official is the recount official and the filing officer. new text end new text begin (b) A candidate defeated in the final round of tabulation when the vote difference is greater than that provided in section 204C.36 may request a recount at the candidate's own expense. A candidate defeated in an earlier round of tabulation may request a recount at the candidate's own expense. The candidate is responsible for all expenses associated with the recount, regardless of the vote difference between the candidates in the round in which the requesting candidate was defeated. The requesting candidate shall file with the filing officer a bond, cash, or surety in an amount set by the filing officer for the payment of the recount expenses. Expenses must be determined as provided in section 204C.36, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (c) The secretary of state must adopt rules governing recounts conducted under this section. new text end new text begin (d) At the discretion of the recount official, in the case of a recount under paragraph (a) or (b) or by the requesting candidates, a recount may commence with the earliest tabulation round in which any requesting candidate was defeated or any prior round. All other candidates who, in the initial tabulation, were defeated prior to the round in which the recount starts may be presumed to have been correctly defeated. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [204E.10] LOCAL RANKED CHOICE ELECTIONS; POSTELECTION REVIEW. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Selection of test date; notice. new text end new text begin At the canvass, the ranked choice voting local election official must select by lot the offices and precincts to be reviewed and set the date, time, and place for the postelection review, in accordance with section 206.89. Postelection review is not required for a hand count election. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Scope and conduct of test. new text end new text begin The postelection review must be conducted in public and must review a sample of ballots cast for at least one single-seat ranked choice voting election and at least one multiple-seat election, if such an election occurred. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Review. new text end new text begin (a) For each office to be reviewed, the number of precincts selected for review shall be determined as follows: if the office was voted on in fewer than five precincts, one precinct shall be selected; if the office was voted on in at least five precincts and fewer than 50 precincts, two precincts shall be selected; if the office was voted on in at least 50 precincts and fewer than 100 precincts, three precincts shall be selected; and if the office was voted on in at least 100 precincts, four precincts or three percent of the total number of precincts in the election shall be selected, whichever is greater. new text end new text begin (b) For each office voted on in a county election, the ranked choice voting local election official may select precincts as specified in paragraph (a) or use the precincts selected in accordance with section 206.89. new text end new text begin (c) Using the actual ballots cast in each precinct selected, the judges of the election shall conduct a hand-count tabulation of how many ballots contain each combination of candidates across the rankings. All undeclared write-in candidates shall be considered as a group in this hand count, and blank or overvoted rankings shall be included as such in the tabulated combinations. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Standard of acceptable performance by voting system. new text end new text begin A comparison of the results compiled by the voting system with the cast vote records compiled by the judges of the election performing the hand count must show that the results of the electronic voting system differed by no more than the applicable threshold provided in section 206.89, subdivision 4, from the hand count of the sample tested. Valid votes that have been marked by the voter outside the vote targets or using a manual marking device that cannot be read by the voting system must not be included in making the determination whether the voting system has met the standard of acceptable performance. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Additional review if needed. new text end new text begin An additional review is required if: new text end new text begin (1) a test reveals a difference greater than the threshold provided in section 206.89, subdivision 4, in at least one precinct of an office, the ranked choice voting local election official must immediately, publicly select by lot two additional precincts of the same office for review. The additional precinct review must be completed within two days after the precincts are selected and the results immediately reported to the county auditor; and new text end new text begin (2) the additional precinct review indicates a difference in the vote totals that is greater than the applicable threshold, as provided by section 206.89, subdivision 4, in at least one additional precinct of an office, the ranked choice voting local election official must conduct a review of the ballots from all the remaining precincts in the office being reviewed. new text end new text begin This review must be completed no later than two weeks after the canvass. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report of results. new text end new text begin Upon completion of the postelection review, the ranked choice voting local election official must immediately report the results to the county auditor and make the results available to the public. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Update of vote totals. new text end new text begin If the postelection review under this section results in a change in the number of votes counted for any candidate, the revised vote totals must be incorporated in the official result from those precincts. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Effect on voting systems. new text end new text begin If a voting system is found to have failed to record votes accurately and in the manner provided by this chapter, the voting system must not be used at another election until it has been approved for use by the county auditor, pursuant to section 206.58. In addition, the county auditor may order the city to conduct a hand recount of all ballots cast in the election. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin [204E.11] RULES; LOCAL OPTION RANKED CHOICE VOTING. new text end new text begin The secretary of state must adopt rules necessary to implement the requirements and procedures established by this chapter. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Notice of filing dates. At least two weeks before the first day to file affidavits of candidacy, the municipal clerk shall publish a notice stating the first and last dates on which affidavits of candidacy may be filed in the clerk's office and the closing time for filing on the last day for filing. The clerk shall post a similar notice at least ten days before the first day to file affidavits of candidacy. new text begin If ranked choice voting pursuant to chapter 204E is to be used, the notice must indicate the method of election to be used for the offices on the ballot.new text end The notice must separately list any office for which affidavits of candidacy may be filed to fill the unexpired portion of a term when a special election is being held to fill a vacancy as provided in section 412.02, subdivision 2a. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 206.57, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Required certification for ranked choice voting. new text end new text begin In addition to the requirements of this section, a voting system used to administer ranked choice voting under chapter 204E must provide a test lab report from a voting system test lab accredited by the Election Assistance Commission or other appropriate federal agency responsible for testing and certification of compliance with the federal voting systems guidelines at the time of submission of the application required by subdivision 1. The test lab report must show that the system is in conformity with voluntary voting system guidelines issued by the Election Assistance Commission or other appropriate federal agency. new text end Sec. 17. new text begin [206.802] ELECTRONIC VOTING SYSTEMS; PURCHASING. new text end new text begin A voting system purchased for use in Minnesota to administer ranked choice voting on or after the effective date of this section must have the ability to: new text end new text begin (1) capture, store, and publicly report ballot data; new text end new text begin (2) to the extent practicable, produce a single human-readable file for each contest on the ballot containing all cast vote records captured for that contest; new text end new text begin (3) keep data anonymous; new text end new text begin (4) accept ranked or cumulative voting data under a variety of tabulation rules; new text end new text begin (5) be programmable to follow all other specifications of the ranked choice voting system or be compatible with automatic tabulating equipment or a software reallocation feature; new text end new text begin (6) provide a minimum of three rankings for ranked choice voting elections; new text end new text begin (7) to the extent practicable, notify voters of the following errors: overvotes, skipped rankings, and repeat candidate rankings in a ranked choice voting election; and new text end new text begin (8) be programmable to print a zero tape indicating all rankings for all candidates in a ranked choice voting election. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon certification by the secretary of state that equipment meeting the standards required by this section is available for purchase and implementation. The secretary of state must notify the revisor of statutes when this certification is made. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 206.83, is amended to read: 206.83 TESTING OF VOTING SYSTEMS. new text begin (a) new text end At least three days before voting equipment is used, the official in charge of elections shall have the voting system tested to ascertain that the system will correctly mark ballots using all methods supported by the system, includingnew text begin ranked choice voting if applicable, andnew text end through assistive technology, and count the votes cast for all candidates and on all questions. Public notice of the time and place of the test must be given at least two days in advance by publication once in official newspapers. The test must be observed by at least two election judges, who are not of the same major political party, and must be open to representatives of the political parties, candidates, the press, and the public. The test must be conducted by (1) processing a preaudited group of ballots punched or marked to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each question, and must include for each office one or more ballot cards which have votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the voting system tabulator and electronic ballot marker to reject those votes; and (2) processing an additional test deck of ballots marked using the electronic ballot marker for the precinct, including ballots marked using the electronic ballot display, audio ballot reader, and any assistive voting technology used with the electronic ballot marker.new text begin If an election is to be conducted using ranked choice voting, the equipment must also be tested to ensure that each ranking for each candidate is recorded properly.new text end new text begin (b)new text end If any error is detected, the cause must be ascertained and corrected and an errorless count must be made before the voting system may be used in the election. new text begin (c)new text end After the completion of the test, the programs used and ballot cards must be sealed, retained, and disposed of as provided for paper ballots. Sec. 19. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the secretary of state for costs associated with implementation of this act. new text end